Washington statutes.
RCW 16.58.095

Inspection required for cattle not having inspection certificate.

All cattle entering or reentering a certified feed lot must be inspected upon entry, unless they are accompanied by an inspection certificate issued by the director, or any other agency authorized in any state or Canadian province by law to issue a certificate. Licensees shall report a discrepancy between cattle entering or reentering a certified feed lot and the inspection certificate accompanying the cattle to the nearest inspector immediately. A discrepancy may require an inspection of all the cattle entering or reentering the lot, except as may otherwise be provided by rule.

[ 2003 c 326 s 53; 1991 c 109 s 11; 1979 c 81 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.